Idaho, session 2025, H0315.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3622VV, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
63-3622VV. IDAHO INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT. (1) On and after
July 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2025, there is exempted from the taxes
imposed by this chapter the purchase or use of eligible server equipment
and new data center facilities, as defined in this section. The exemption
provided in this section shall be available only to qualifying business
entities and contractors installing eligible server equipment or building
new data center facilities for qualifying business entities. On and after
March 1, 2025, the exemption provided in this section shall only be available
for the time period provided in subsection (2)(k) of this section and shall
be subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section; however,
such limitations shall not apply to any taxpayer that received the exemption
provided in this section before March 1, 2025. The exemption provided in
this section shall not be available for property that has been the subject of
business incentives granted to a taxpayer or its affiliates, pursuant to the
Idaho reimbursement incentive act, sections 67-4737 through 67-4744, Idaho
Code.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Business entity" means a separate legal entity or separately oper-
ated segment of business that exists for the primary purpose of engaging
in a commercial activity for profit and whose sole purpose is the oper-
ation of a data center. For the purposes of this section, a separately
operated segment of business is a segment of a business for which sep-
arate records are maintained and that is operated by an employee or em-
ployees whose primary employment responsibility is to operate the busi-
ness segment.
(b) "Cabling" means a fiber or copper cable used in data centers to con-
nect information sources to a server or storage device.
(c) "Capital investment" means real or tangible personal property that
is purchased for use in Idaho and is used by a business entity for the
purpose of operating a data center.
(d) "Chiller" means a cooling system used in data centers to remove heat
from an element and deposit it into another element.
(e) "Commencement of operations" means the date on which a certificate
of occupancy is issued for a data center.


(f) "Data center" means a facility comprised of one (1) or more build-
ings in Idaho that is used to house eligible server equipment for the
transmission and storage of data where the facility has the following
characteristics:
(i) Uninterruptible power supplies, generator power, or both;
(ii) Sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and
(iii) Enhanced physical security and restricted access.
(g) "Eligible server equipment" means new server equipment acquired
by a qualifying business entity as described in this subsection that is
maintained and operated in a data center located in Idaho for the sole
purpose of data transmission and storage services, providing data and
transaction processing services, information technology services, or
computer collocation services. "Eligible server equipment" includes
servers, rack servers, chillers, storage devices, generators, cabling,
and enabling software integral to or installed on such equipment.
(h) "Generator" means an engine used in data centers to convert mechan-
ical energy into electricity.
(i) "New data center facilities" means buildings or structural com-
ponents of buildings, including equipment, materials, and fixtures
thereof, that are used in or intended for use primarily as a data center
in Idaho.
(j) "New jobs" means new jobs created in Idaho that are nonseasonal,
full-time jobs that collectively pay an average weekly wage that equals
or exceeds the average weekly wage for the county where the data center
is located, as determined by the most recent report of the United States
bureau of labor statistics. A job that merely changes locations within
the state of Idaho shall not be considered a new job under this section.
New jobs must exceed the business entity's highest number of full-time
employees in Idaho during the twenty-four (24) months immediately pre-
ceding the commencement of operations of the data center.
(k) "Qualifying business entity" means a business entity that certi-
fies to the state tax commission that it will make capital investments
in one (1) or more data centers after July 1, 2020, in amounts of at
least two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in the aggre-
gate within the first five (5) years after commencement of construction
and that it will create and maintain at least thirty (30) new jobs at
the data center within two (2) calendar years after the commencement of
operations. Such business entities shall be entitled to a provisional
exemption pursuant to this section during the period in which they make
capital investments in data center property. If a business entity fails
to meet the investment and job creation requirements provided within
the time periods required in this section, it shall pay sales or use
taxes that would have been due if not for the granting of the provi-
sional exemption. If a business entity meets the investment and job
creation requirements provided within the time periods required in this
section, its provisional exemption shall become final without further
action, and thereafter the exemption shall also apply to all additional
purchases of eligible server equipment and purchases associated with
constructing new data center facilities. Any qualifying business en-
tity that has received the exemption provided in this section prior to


March 1, 2025, shall not be subject to exemption expiration after seven
(7) years as provided in this subsection. For any qualifying business
entity that receives this exemption after March 1, 2025, the exemption
shall expire seven (7) years from the date that the provisional exemp-
tion becomes final.
(l) "Rack server" means a computer in a data center dedicated to use as a
server and designed to be installed in a framework called a rack.
(m) "Server" means a computer or computer program used in data centers
that manages access to a centralized resource or service in a network.
(n) "Storage device" means a piece of computer equipment on which in-
formation can be stored and that is used in data centers.
(3) A qualifying business entity that receives an exemption pursuant to
this section on and after March 1, 2025, shall, for each year after the exemp-
tion expires after the time period provided in subsection (2)(k) of this sec-
tion, remit to the state tax commission sales tax on any item that would oth-
erwise be exempt if the qualifying business entity was continuing to claim
the exemption provided in this section. The state tax commission shall, on a
quarterly basis, transfer all such remitted funds to the tax relief fund es-
tablished pursuant to section 57-811, Idaho Code.
(3) (4) The state tax commission may promulgate rules to administer
and enforce the provisions of this section, including the promulgation of
rules relating to the provision of information necessary to certify that the
taxpayer satisfies the criteria for a qualifying business entity and to fa-
cilitate the remittance of taxes pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
For the purpose of carrying out its duties to administer and enforce the
provisions of this section, the state tax commission shall have the powers
and duties provided by sections 63-217, 63-3038, 63-3039, 63-3042 through
63-3067, 63-3068, 63-3071, and 63-3074 through 63-3078, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.